District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.01

No requirement of members; other persons designated by articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(a)

A nonprofit corporation shall not be required to have members.

(b)

If the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a nonprofit corporation do not provide that it must have members, or if a corporation has in fact no members entitled to vote on a matter, any provision of this chapter or any other provision of law requiring notice to, the presence of, or the vote, consent, or other action by members of the corporation in connection with the matter shall be satisfied by notice to, the presence of, or the vote, consent, or other action by the board of directors or a designated body of the corporation.

(c)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws of a nonprofit corporation may designate a person as a member who is not within the definition of “member” under § 29-401.02(24). Such a person, regardless of designation, shall not be deemed a member for purposes of this chapter but nevertheless shall have those rights and obligations set forth in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720